Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.455

Violations—Notice, orders, damages.

(1) When the director has probable cause to believe that milk or milk products are being sold, distributed, stored, or transported in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, the director may issue and serve upon the owner or custodian of the milk or milk products a written notice of embargo and order prohibiting the sale of the milk or milk products. If the owner or custodian is not available for service, the director may attach the notice of embargo and order prohibiting sale to the container holding the milk or milk products. The milk or milk products shall not be sold, used, or removed until this chapter has been complied with and the milk or milk products have been released from embargo under conditions specified by the director in writing.

(2) The department may issue a destruction and disposal order covering any embargoed milk or milk products. The destruction and disposal shall occur at the cost of the owner or custodian.

(3) The person to whom the notice of embargo and order prohibiting sale was issued or the person to whom a destruction or disposal order was issued may request an adjudicative proceeding to contest the order.

(4) A state court shall not allow the recovery of damages from an administrative action under this section if the court finds there was probable cause for the action.

[ 2006 c 157 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 157: See note following RCW 15.36.012.